Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Deferred Compensation Plans

Law reviews.

For note, “How Special is the Special Timing Rule?
Analyzing the Timing of FICA Taxation in Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plans,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 427 (2018).

45-18-30.
“Employee” defined.

As used in this article, the term “employee” means any person, whether appointed or elected, who provides services for the state, including any state authority authorized to participate in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia under Chapter 2 of Title 47, or for a county, municipality, or other political subdivision and who is paid for providing such services.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 198, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1417, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275.

45-18-31.
Deferred compensation plans authorized for state, municipalities, counties, or other political subdivisions.

The state or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision may contract with any employee to defer, in whole or in part, any portion of such employee’s compensation under a deferred compensation plan; and the state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision may provide the deferred compensation plan itself or it may contract with any company qualified to do business in this state to provide such benefits.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 198, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275.

45-18-32.
Administration of plans; participation by employees of county boards of health, school systems, Lake Allatoona Preservation Authority, the Georgia Federal-State Shipping Point Inspection Service, and the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund; provision in plans for income tax deferral benefits.

The Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall administer any deferred compensation plan provided for the employees of the state.

Employees of the county boards of health receiving financial assistance from the Department of Public Health may, with the approval of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and the approval of such organizations, participate in the state plan.

Employees of county and independent school systems may, with the approval of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and the approval of such systems, participate in the state plan.

Employees of the Lake Allatoona Preservation Authority, the Georgia Federal-State Shipping Point Inspection Service, and the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund may, with the approval of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and the approval of such organizations, participate in the state plan.

The Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall investigate and approve a deferred compensation plan which gives the employees of the state income tax benefits in connection with plans authorized by the United States Internal Revenue Code, so that compensation deferred under such plan shall not be included for purposes of computation of any federal income tax withheld on behalf of any such employee or payable by such employee before any deferred payment date. All contributions to the deferred compensation plan shall also be exempt from state withholding tax as long as such contributions are not includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes.

Notwithstanding any conflicting provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, for any deferred compensation plan established pursuant to said paragraph, the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall be authorized to include as an option for eligible employees a qualified Roth contribution program in accordance with Section 402A of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

The governing body of a city, county, or other political subdivision may appoint an administrator for all deferred compensation plans, whose duties shall include the administration of the plan and the investigation and approval of the plan or plans. All such plans shall provide tax deferral benefits for the respective employees in a manner similar to that of the plan for state employees and may provide as an option for eligible employees a qualified Roth contribution program in accordance with Section 402A of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 198, § 4; Ga. L. 1981, p. 662, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 814, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2017, p. 716, § 1/HB 312.

The 2017 amendment,

effective January 1, 2018, designated the previously existing provisions of this Code section as subsections (a) through (d); added subparagraph (c)(2); and added “and may provide as an option for eligible employees a qualified Roth contribution program in accordance with Section 402A of the United States Internal Revenue Code” at the end of subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

45-18-33.
Payments from deferred compensation funds for purchase of insurance, endowments, annuities, mutual funds, or savings from funds derived from deferral; custodian of assets of the fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in order to carry out the provisions of the deferred compensation plan, the state or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision is authorized to make payments for the purchase of insurance, endowments, annuities, mutual funds, or savings from funds derived from the deferral of compensation. Such payments shall not be construed to be a prohibited use of the general assets of the state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision. The Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or the administrator of the plan shall have the power to arrange for a custodian for the holding of such insurance policies, funds, investments, and other assets of the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 198, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 119, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275.

45-18-34.
Plans not to reduce pensions or other benefits.

The deferred compensation programs authorized by this article shall exist and serve in addition to retirement, pension, or benefit systems established by the state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision; and no deferral of income under the deferred compensation program shall effect a reduction of any retirement, pension, or other benefit provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 198, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275.

45-18-35.
Plans to operate without cost to state, counties, cities, or other political subdivisions.

The Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or the administrator of the plan shall arrange for all services required to carry out the deferred compensation plan or plans so that such plan or plans shall operate without cost to the state, county, city, or other political subdivision except for:

Employer contributions to a deferred compensation plan;

The incidental expense of administering the payroll salary deduction or reduction and the remittance thereof; or

The payment of costs or fees associated with an employee’s participation in a deferred compensation plan when authorized by the governing authority of a municipality pursuant to ordinance or resolution.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 198, § 7; Ga. L. 2003, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275; Ga. L. 2018, p. 743, § 1/SB 333.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or the administrator of the plan shall arrange for all services required to carry out the deferred compensation plan or plans so that such plan or plans shall operate without cost to the state, county, city, or other political subdivision except for employer contributions to a deferred compensation plan and for the incidental expense of administering the payroll salary deduction or reduction and the remittance thereof.”

45-18-36.
Salary deductions; records of individual account information.

The salary reduction or deductions referred to in this article shall be instituted:

At the request of the participating employees by the payroll departments applicable to the respective employees; or

Pursuant to an automatic enrollment arrangement permitted by and operated in accordance with applicable federal laws and regulations.

Records of participation agreements, payroll deductions, investment options, and other individual account information shall be maintained as confidential by the administrator. The records shall not be disclosed except as necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article or in cases where a subpoena has been issued for the purpose of discovery or as otherwise authorized in writing by the employee. This prohibition shall not bar federal, state, or local tax authorities from such access to the records as may be necessary to establish the tax status or liability of a participating employee.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 198, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 313, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275; Ga. L. 2018, p. 743, § 2/SB 333.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “The salary reduction or deductions referred to in this article shall be instituted at the request of the participating employees by the payroll departments applicable to the respective employees.”

45-18-37.
[Reserved] Special pay plan for deferred payment of special compensation to reduce federal tax burden.

History.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 764, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275; repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 172, § 1/HB 213, effective July 1, 2007.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 172, § 1/HB 213 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2007.

45-18-38.
Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System to be the successor to the State Personnel Board and Employee Benefit Council for administration of deferred compensation plans; employment of and contracting with agents.

Effective July 1, 2005, the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall be the successor to the State Personnel Board for the purpose of administering any deferred compensation plan provided to employees as referenced in Code Sections 45-18-32 and 45-18-33. The State Personnel Board shall transfer individual accounts, associated funds, and any other applicable information in a manner prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia no later than September 30, 2005.

The Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall be the successor to the Employee Benefit Council for the purpose of administering any deferred compensation plan provided to employees as referenced in Code Section 45-18-52. The Employee Benefit Council shall transfer individual accounts, associated funds, and any other applicable information in a manner prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

The Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia is authorized to employ agents and to contract with such agents for their services as investment advisors and counselors who will make recommendations for investments and make investments as the board of trustees so authorizes.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-38

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 134, § 1/HB 275; Ga. L. 2006, p. 217, § 1/HB 1151.